Washington statutes.
RCW 15.76.140

Eligibility requirements for state allocation.

(1) Before any agricultural fair may become eligible for state allocations it must have conducted two successful consecutive annual fairs immediately preceding application for such allocations, and have its application therefor approved by the director.

(2) The director may waive the requirement in subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) A county fair reorganizing as an area fair has, through a current or predecessor organization, received an allocation from the fair fund as a county fair for at least two years; or

(b) A fair is not held due to a natural disaster such as a flood or wildfire.

[ 2018 c 280 s 5; 2001 c 157 s 1; 1995 c 374 s 71; 1965 ex.s. c 32 s 1; 1961 c 61 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 157: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 2, 2001]." [ 2001 c 157 s 2.]